Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 1 Department of Human Services

40-1-1.
Advisory council — Appointment of members.

Within the department of human services there shall be an advisory council consisting of nine (9) qualified electors of the state, who shall be appointed by the governor as provided in this section. In the month of February in each year the governor shall appoint a member, or members, of the council, each to hold office until the first day of March in the fifth year after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, to succeed the member whose term shall next expire.

Any vacancy that may occur in the council shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term and members of the council shall be chosen with due regard to their knowledge of social welfare problems and the director of the department shall designate some person to act as secretary of the council.

The council shall meet at least four (4) times during any one year and at such additional times as the director of the department shall designate. The members of the council shall elect one of their members as chairperson upon the appointment of any new member for a full term and whenever the office becomes vacant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 88; G.L. 1956, §§

40-1-1

,

40-1-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 23, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 123.

40-1-2.
Functions of advisory council.

The council shall make suggestions to and shall advise the director of the department concerning the policies, rules, and regulations of the department. The council shall have no administrative power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 88; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-3

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-2

; P.L. 1974, ch. 126, § 1.

40-1-3.
Advisory committees to agencies within department.

The director of the department of human services shall be authorized to appoint advisory committees as he or she thinks appropriate to make suggestions to and to advise the various agencies within the department. The members of the committees shall serve without pay. The chairperson of each committee shall be designated by the director and shall sit ex-officio with the department advisory committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 126, § 1.

40-1-4.
Organization of department.

All functions, services, and duties of the department of human services shall be organized by the director with the approval of the governor as to:

Community services to include generally and specifically the administration of all forms of human services excluding child welfare services, which are the responsibility of the department of children, youth and families.

Management services to include generally and specifically all central management, financial, forms of relief, and other services concerned with the business and servicing operations of the department.

Veterans’ affairs to include all forms of services to veterans of the armed forces. There shall be within the department of human services an office of veterans services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 92; P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-4

; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 11; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 16; P.L. 1988, ch. 566, § 1.

40-1-4.1.
Name change.

The department of social and rehabilitative services is hereby renamed the department of human services. Whenever in the general or public laws there appears any reference to the department of social and rehabilitative services, the reference shall be construed to refer to the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 35, § 1.

40-1-5.
Reorganizations within department.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any division, bureau, or other unit or agency within the department of human services, however entitled or described, may at any time be reorganized, divided, consolidated, abolished, or otherwise reconstituted by the director of human services with the approval of the governor, as may be desirable for the proper administration and performance of the powers, functions, and duties assigned to the department, and any change shall conform with the requirements of §

40-1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 94; P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-6

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-1-6.
Officers required to be veterans.

The respective officers appointed by the director of human services to be in charge of the state’s administration of veterans’ relief, of graves’ registration, and the commandant and the assistant commandant of the Rhode Island veterans’ home, in addition to any other qualifications required for their respective positions as already provided in law, shall each be an honorably discharged war veteran of any war in which the United States has been engaged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 989, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 1997, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-7

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-1-7.
Offices of department.

The department of administration shall furnish the state department of human services offices in which to transact its business and keep its records. The offices shall be open for business each day of the year, except Sundays and legal holidays, during such hours as may be prescribed by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 25; P.L. 1926, ch. 829, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-8

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-1-8.
Appointment of employees.

The director of the department of human services, subject to the provisions of chapter 4 of title 36, shall be the appointing authority for all employees of the department, and the director may assign this function to subordinate officers and employees as may to him or her seem feasible or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 99, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-1-9

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-1-9.
Adaptive telephone equipment loan program fund.

There is hereby created an adaptive telephone equipment loan program fund that shall be administered by the general treasurer and the principal and interest of which shall be used solely for the purpose of providing funds for the purchase, maintenance, replacement, and distribution of telephone telecommunications devices and special-needs equipment, and the administrative expenses of the general treasurer incurred in conjunction therewith, for the deaf, the severely hearing impaired, and severely speech impaired who have been duly certified as such in accordance with §

39-2-5(7)

[Subdivision (7) was deleted].

The regulated telephone utilities shall pay over to the general treasurer any and all sums received as a monthly surcharge in accordance with §

39-2-5(7)

[Subdivision (7) was deleted]. The general treasurer shall invest and reinvest the sums so received in accordance with the laws of Rhode Island.

Upon receipt of duly authenticated vouchers from the director of the department of human services, the general treasurer may draw upon the principal or income of the fund to effectuate the provisions of §

39-2-5(7)

[Subdivision (7) was deleted].

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 48, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 554, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 115, § 4.

40-1-10.
Transfer of functions from the department of community affairs.

There is hereby transferred to the department of human services those functions formerly administered by the department of community affairs relating to:

Administrative support to federal grants;

Community services block grants;

Domestic violence project;

Community agency liaison and funding (women and human services);

Community agency liaison and funding (energy and community services);

Displaced homemaker centers;

Federal surplus commodity distribution;

Health center grants;

Community action fund;

Commission on Indian affairs.

In addition to any of its other powers and responsibilities, the department is authorized and empowered to accept any grants made available by the United States government or any agency thereof, and the department, with the approval of the governor, is authorized and empowered to perform such acts and enter into all necessary contracts and agreements with the United States, or any agency thereof, as may be necessary in the manner and degree as shall be deemed to be in the best interests of the state. The proceeds of grants so received shall be paid to the general treasurer of the state and by him or her deposited in a separate fund and shall be utilized for the purposes of the grant or grants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 4.

40-1-11.
Displaced homemakers center.

There is hereby established within the department of human services a displaced homemakers center.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 11.

40-1-12.
“Displaced homemaker” defined.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, “displaced homemaker” means a person who:

Worked in the home for a substantial number of years providing unpaid household services for family members;

Who is not gainfully employed;

Has or would have difficulty in securing employment; and

Was dependent on the income of another family member but is no longer supported by the income, or was dependent on assistance from the state or federal government but is no longer eligible for assistance for reasons other than willful failure to comply with rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 11.

40-1-13.
Duties of director and center staff.

The director shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies to coordinate the service programs established pursuant to §

40-1-14

.

The director shall promulgate rules concerning the eligibility of persons for the job training and other programs of the multipurpose service center; the granting of stipends for the job training programs from available funds; and a sliding fee scale for the service programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 11.

40-1-14.
Powers and scope of activities.

In order to enable the displaced homemaker to contribute to society and maintain independence and economic security, the director shall establish a multipurpose service center for displaced homemakers. The director may make a grant to a nonprofit agency or organization to carry out the various programs.

The center shall develop, by working with federal, state and local governmental agencies, private employers, and charitable or nonprofit agencies, job counseling and placement services specifically designed for displaced homemakers, which services shall:

Counsel displaced homemakers with respect to appropriate job opportunities;

Identify community needs and endeavor to develop and to create new jobs for displaced homemakers in the private and public sector;

Provide displaced homemakers with the necessary counseling, training, skills, and referral services to become gainfully employed and independent;

Develop plans to include more displaced homemakers in existing training and placement programs;

Refer displaced homemakers to agencies that may provide information and assistance with respect to health care, financial matters, education, nutrition, and legal problems; and

Take into account and build upon the skills and experiences of the displaced homemaker.

The center shall develop an outreach program with a special emphasis directed toward reaching displaced homemakers in their middle years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 11.

40-1-15.
Reimbursement to health center.

The director shall reimburse certain health centers at a rate of twenty-four dollars ($24.00) per patient visit for physician services including case management. In accordance with the state Medicaid plan as provided in chapter 8 of this title, any rules or regulations as established in accordance with §

40-8-13

, calling for a lower rate per patient visit, shall be raised to conform to the new rate as set forth above. For the purpose of this section, the reimbursement fee shall apply only to the following health centers:

Providence Ambulatory Health Care Foundation;

Health Services, Inc. of Woonsocket;

Blackstone Valley Community Action;

Cranston Health and Family Planning Center;

East Providence Community Health Center;

New Visions of Newport County;

Tri-Town Health Center;

Warwick Community Health Center;

Chad Brown Health Center;

Health Center of South County;

North Kingstown Regional Health Center; and

Pawtucket Neighborhood Health Center.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 26, § 3.

40-1-16.
Visiting nurse association — Payment.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Agency” means the Kent County Visiting Nurse Association; Newport Visiting Nurse Service; VNA, Inc.; Visiting Nurse Services of Woonsocket; Little Compton Visiting Nurse Association; Northwest Community Nursing & Health Service; Visiting Nurse Services of Pawtucket; and Visiting Nurse Services of Washington County and Jamestown;

“Home visit” means a visit, by the agency to a client during which skilled nursing services, physical, speech, and/or occupational therapy services, and/or home health aide services are rendered to the client, and the visit is reportable on the Medicare cost report; and

“Reference year” means the previous fiscal year.

The director shall apportion any appropriation for visiting nurse association in accordance with the following:

Ten percent (10%) of the appropriation shall be divided equally among the agencies.

Ninety percent (90%) of the appropriation shall be divided by the statewide total number of home visits for the reference year.

Each agency shall receive an amount equal to the quotient in subsection (b)(2) multiplied by the number of home visits by the agency in the reference year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 305, § 1.

40-1-17.
Receipt and use of funds.

To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the department of human services, with the approval of the governor, shall have the authority to receive and expend monies from any other sources, public or private, including, but not limited to, legislative enactments, bond issues, gifts, devises, grants, bequests, or donations. The department of human services, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to enter into any contracts necessary to obtain and expend those funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 2, § 4.